District of Columbia statutes.
31-5704

Repealed

Required annual reports; contents.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1311, ch. 854, § 752
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(n), 44 DCR 1730
Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 1237(a), 45 DCR 1172
1981 Ed., § 35-1204.
1973 Ed., § 35-904.
Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-5702.